Louisiana, session 2026, SB333.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Arts. 603(24) through (32), 623(A), (B), and (E), 679(D)
and (F), 695(A) and (D), 705(A) and (D), 710(A)(2), and 1004.2 are hereby amended and
reenacted and Children's Code Arts. 581.1 through 581.4 and 603(33) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
Art. 581.1. Contractual agreement; Title IV-E eligible legal representation
costs; claims; definitions
For purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
Services.
(2) "Legal representation agency" includes the office of the state public
defender, office of the district attorney, Louisiana Bar Foundation, Mental
Health Advocacy Service, and any other entity providing legal representation
to children, parents, or caregivers eligible for Title IV-E eligible legal
representation costs.
(3) "Title IV-E eligible legal representation costs" refers to federal
financial participation for the legal representation costs necessary for the
proper and efficient administration of the Title IV-E plan as provided in 45
CFR 1356.60(c).
Art. 581.2. Contractual agreement; duty to negotiate
A.(1) The department shall, in good faith, negotiate contractual
agreements with legal representation agencies operating within the state to
allow the agencies to claim reimbursement for Title IV-E eligible legal
representation costs as provided for in this Article.
(2) The department shall provide technical assistance to a legal
representation agency to ensure compliance with federal requirements to make
a claim for Title IV-E eligible legal representation costs.
(3) The department shall have the right to incorporate a reasonable
administrative fee in the agreement as needed.
(4) A legal representation agency seeking initial Title IV-E
reimbursement shall submit notice to the department by August first of each
year for inclusion in the next fiscal year. A new agreement shall not take effect
before July first of the following fiscal year. The department shall exercise good
faith in limiting the number of new agencies receiving Title IV-E
reimbursement each year based on capacity.
B. The contractual agreement shall include provisions for all of the
following:
(1) Title IV-E eligible legal representation cost reimbursement
methodology and rates consistent with standard legal representation billing.
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
(2) A process by which the legal representation agency shall submit the
billing for reimbursement.
(3) A requirement that the legal representation agency provide
documentation to substantiate the billing reimbursement claim.
(4) A procedure for processing and disbursing the funds received as
reimbursement.
(5) A requirement that the legal representation agency timely complete
orders to determine Title IV-E eligibility of the client.
(6) A requirement that the legal representation agency remain in full
compliance with all of the Title IV-E program requisites.
(7) The right of any state or federal partner agency to audit the
performance or billing of the legal representation agency pursuant to the
agreement.
Art. 581.3. Reimbursement; legal representation costs; retention
A. A legal representation agency that obtains Title IV-E eligible legal
representation costs pursuant to Article 581.2 shall retain all of the funds.
B. The funds received as reimbursement shall not be subject to
reallocation or reduction by the department or any other state agency and shall
remain available to the legal representation agency to support and enhance legal
representation services provided for children, parents, caregivers, or the state
in foster care and adoption proceedings.
Art. 581.4. Promulgation of rules
The department shall promulgate policies and rules necessary to
implement the provisions of Articles 581.1 through 581.3 no later than July first
of the year following its enactment.
* * *
Art. 603. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(24) "Pre-adoptive parent" means an individual who has been identified
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
in the child's case plan or permanency plan as the prospective adoptive parent
or to whom a court has granted custody of the child when the child's
permanency plan is adoption pursuant to an order of a court.
(25) "Prenatal neglect" means exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol
or the unlawful use of any controlled dangerous substance, as defined by R.S. 40:961
et seq., or in a manner not lawfully prescribed, which results in symptoms of
withdrawal in the newborn or the presence of a controlled substance or a metabolic
thereof in his body, blood, urine, or meconium that is not the result of medical
treatment, or observable and harmful effects in his physical appearance or
functioning.
(25)(26) "Protective capacity" means the cognitive, behavioral, and emotional
knowledge, abilities, and practices that prevent or control threats of danger to
children.
(26)(27) "Reasonable efforts" means the exercise of ordinary diligence and
care by the department throughout the pendency of a case pursuant to the obligations
imposed on the state by federal and state law to provide services and supports
designed and intended to prevent or eliminate the need for removing a child from the
child's home, to reunite families after separation, and to achieve safe permanency for
children. Reasonable efforts shall be determined by the particular facts and
circumstances of each case, including the individualized needs of each child and the
family, the imminence and potential severity of the threat of danger, the strengths of
each child and the family, and the community of support available to the family. In
making reasonable efforts, the health, welfare, and safety of the child shall be the
paramount concern.
(27)(28) "Relative" means an individual with whom the child has established
a significant relationship by blood, adoption, or affinity.
(28)(29) "Removal" means placing a child in the custody of the state or with
someone other than the parent or caretaker during or after the course of an
investigation of abuse and neglect to secure the child's health, welfare, and safety.
(29)(30) "Safe" and "safety" mean the condition of not being unsafe. Whether
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
a child is unsafe shall be determined by the particular facts and circumstances of
each case, including consideration of the threat of danger to the child, whether the
child is vulnerable to the threat, and the parent's or caretaker's protective capacity to
manage or control the threat.
(30)(31) "Safety plan" means a plan for the purpose of assuring a child's
health, welfare, and safety by imposing conditions for the child to safely remain in
the home, or, after a child has been removed from the home, for the continued
placement of the child with a custodian and terms for contact between the child and
the child's parents or other persons.
(31)(32) "Threat of danger" exists when the behavior of a parent or caretaker
or the family situation indicates serious harm, in the near future, to the child's
physical, mental, or emotional health, welfare, and safety.
(32)(33) "Vulnerable" means the inability to protect oneself from identified
threats of danger.
* * *
Art. 623. Notice; presence at hearing; right to be heard
A.(1) The department shall give notice of any order regarding the child issued
in accordance with Article 619(C) or 620 to the child's parents, the district defender
or other entity designated for the jurisdiction by the Indigent Parents' Representation
Program for representing parents, the entity designated for the jurisdiction by the
Louisiana Supreme Court to provide qualified, independent counsel for the child, and
other parties.
(2) The department shall also give written notice regarding any child in
foster care to any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, and relative providing care.
(3) The department shall notify the court of each party's address and shall
have a continuing duty to provide current information to the court about each party's
whereabouts.
B.(1) The notice shall state the date, time, and place of any scheduled hearing
and inform the recipient of the right to attend and be heard.
(2) The notice to the district defender and the entity designated for the
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
jurisdiction by the Louisiana Supreme Court to provide qualified, independent
counsel for the child shall also include a copy of the verified complaint, the affidavit
required in Article 620(B), and any order issued by the court.
* * *
E.(1) The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative
providing care for the child who appears for the hearing. The court shall provide
any foster caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the
child who appears at the hearing a reasonable opportunity to be heard
regarding the care and treatment of the child and may receive evidence from
each person. The court shall consider this information in conjunction with all
other admissible evidence.
(2) The information provided by the foster parent, pre-adoptive parent,
or relative shall be limited to personal knowledge, defined as firsthand
observations of the daily care, functioning, development, behavior, activities,
health, education, and interactions of the child, including visitation,
communication with parents as it relates to the child, sibling relationships, and
any needs for services or support in the home of the caregiver.
* * *
Art. 679. Notice; presence at disposition hearing; right to be heard
* * *
D. The department shall give written notice of the right to appear at the
disposition hearing to any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing
care for the child. The notice shall state the date, time, and place of any
scheduled hearing and inform the recipient of the right to attend and be heard.
* * *
F.(1) The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative
providing care for the child who appears for the hearing. The court shall provide
any foster caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
child who appears at the hearing a reasonable opportunity to be heard
regarding the care and treatment of the child and may receive evidence from
each person. The court shall consider this information in conjunction with all
other admissible evidence.
(2) The information provided by the foster parent, pre-adoptive parent,
or relative shall be limited to personal knowledge, defined as firsthand
observations of the daily care, functioning, development, behavior, activities,
health, education, and interactions of the child, including visitation,
communication with parents as it relates to the child, sibling relationships, and
any needs for services or support in the home of the caregiver.
* * *
Art. 695. Notice; foster parents, pre-adoptive parents, relatives providing care;
presence at case review hearing; right to be heard
A. The department shall give written notice of the right to appear at each
case review hearing to any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing
care for the child.
* * *
D.(1) The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative
providing care for the child who appears for the hearing. The court shall provide
any foster caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the
child who appears at the hearing a reasonable opportunity to be heard
regarding the care and treatment of the child and may receive evidence from
each person. The court shall consider this information in conjunction with all
other admissible evidence.
(2) The information provided by the foster parent, pre-adoptive parent,
or relative shall be limited to personal knowledge, defined as firsthand
observations of the daily care, functioning, development, behavior, activities,
health, education, and interactions of the child, including visitation,
communication with parents as it relates to the child, sibling relationships, and
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
any needs for services or support in the home of the caregiver.
* * *
Art. 705. Notice; presence at permanency hearing; right to be heard
A. The department shall give written notice of the right to appear at each
permanency hearing to any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing
care for the child.
* * *
D.(1) The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative
providing care for the child who appears for the hearing. The court shall provide
any foster caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the
child who appears at the hearing a reasonable opportunity to be heard
regarding the care and treatment of the child and may receive evidence from
each person. The court shall consider this information in conjunction with all
other admissible evidence.
(2) The information provided by the foster parent, pre-adoptive parent,
or relative shall be limited to personal knowledge, defined as firsthand
observations of the child's daily care, functioning, development, behavior,
activities, health, education, and interactions of the child, including visitation,
communication with parents as it relates to the child, sibling relationships, and
any needs for services or support in the home of the caregiver.
* * *
Art. 710. Order; appeal
A. In a written judgment, the court shall make findings of fact regarding:
* * *
(2) The permanent plan that is most appropriate and in the best interest of the
child in accordance with the priorities of Article 702 (C), including the basis for the
permanent plan determination of the child.
* * *
Art. 1004.2. Termination of rights; children in state custody
Page 8 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 333 ENROLLED
The department shall file and pursue to judgment in the trial court a petition
to terminate the parental rights of the parent or parents if the child has been in state
custody for seventeen fifteen of the last twenty-two months, unless the department
has documented in the case plan a compelling reason why filing is not in the best
interest of the child.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.